Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 134.45, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Match. A public library jurisdiction applying for a grant under this section must match the grant with deleted text begin localdeleted text end new text begin nonstatenew text end funds. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for grants awarded after June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 134.45, subdivision 5b, is amended to read: Subd. 5b. Qualification; improvement grants. A public library jurisdiction may apply for a grant in an amount up to deleted text begin $1,000,000deleted text end new text begin $2,000,000new text end or 50 percent, whichever is less, of the approved costs of renovating or expanding an existing library building, or to construct a new library building. Renovation may include remediation of conditions hazardous to health or safety. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for grants awarded after June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin LIBRARY CONSTRUCTION GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of education for the Mary C. Murphy Library Construction Grants Program under Minnesota Statutes, section 134.45. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end